Utah statutes.
48-1d-1051.   Domestication authorized.

(1)  By complying with Sections 48-1d-1051 through 48-1d-1056, a domestic limited liability partnership may become a foreign limited liability partnership if the domestication is authorized by the law of the foreign jurisdiction.

(2)  By complying with the provisions of Sections 48-1d-1051 through 48-1d-1056 applicable to foreign limited liability partnerships, a foreign limited liability partnership may become a domestic limited liability partnership if the domestication is authorized by the law of the foreign limited liability partnership's jurisdiction of formation.

(3)  If a protected agreement contains a provision that applies to a merger of a domestic limited liability partnership but does not refer to a domestication, the provision applies to a domestication of the limited liability partnership as if the domestication were a merger until the provision is amended after January 1, 2014.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

